Washington statutes.
RCW 18.43.105

Disciplinary action—Prohibited conduct, acts, conditions.

In addition to the unprofessional conduct described in RCW 18.235.130, the board may take disciplinary action for the following conduct, acts, or conditions:

(1) Offering to pay, paying or accepting, either directly or indirectly, any substantial gift, bribe, or other consideration to influence the award of professional work;

(2) Being willfully untruthful or deceptive in any professional report, statement or testimony;

(3) Attempting to injure falsely or maliciously, directly or indirectly, the professional reputation, prospects or business of anyone;

(4) Failure to state separately or to charge separately for professional engineering services or land surveying where other services or work are also being performed in connection with the engineering services;

(5) Violation of any provisions of this chapter;

(6) Conflict of interest—Having a financial interest in bidding for or performance of a contract to supply labor or materials for or to construct a project for which employed or retained as an engineer except with the consent of the client or employer after disclosure of such facts; or allowing an interest in any business to affect a decision regarding engineering work for which retained, employed, or called upon to perform;

(7) Nondisclosure—Failure to promptly disclose to a client or employer any interest in a business which may compete with or affect the business of the client or employer;

(8) Unfair competition—Reducing a fee quoted for prospective employment or retainer as an engineer after being informed of the fee quoted by another engineer for the same employment or retainer;

(9) Improper advertising—Soliciting retainer or employment by advertisement which is undignified, self-laudatory, false or misleading, or which makes or invites comparison between the advertiser and other engineers;

(10) Committing any other act, or failing to act, which act or failure are customarily regarded as being contrary to the accepted professional conduct or standard generally expected of those practicing professional engineering or land surveying.

[ 2002 c 86 s 225; 1961 c 142 s 4; 1959 c 297 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 86: See note following RCW 18.08.340.

Part headings not law—Severability—2002 c 86: See RCW 18.235.902 and 18.235.903.